Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-150
Compensation claims; same preference as wage claims.

The right to compensation and all compensation awarded any injured employee or for death claims to his or her dependents in any amount shall have the same preference against the assets of the employer as unpaid wages for labor, but such compensation shall not become a lien on the property of third persons by reason of such preference.

Laws 1913, c. 198, § 51, p. 600;

R.S.1913, § 3692;

C.S.1922, § 3074;

C.S.1929, § 48-151;

R.S.1943, § 48-150;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 77.